third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.aff
FLAG num
#aðalkorn
SFX 318 N 11
SFX 318 0 korn .
SFX 318 0 korna .
SFX 318 0 kornanna .
SFX 318 0 korni .
SFX 318 0 kornið .
SFX 318 0 kornini .
SFX 318 0 korninum .
SFX 318 0 korns .
SFX 318 0 kornsins .
SFX 318 0 kornum .
SFX 318 0 kornunum .

#afturkast
SFX 319 N 12
SFX 319 0 kast .
SFX 319 0 kasta .
SFX 319 0 kastanna .
SFX 319 0 kasti .
SFX 319 0 kastið .
SFX 319 0 kastinum .
SFX 319 0 kasts .
SFX 319 0 kastsins .
SFX 319 0 køst .
SFX 319 0 køstini .
SFX 319 0 køstum .
SFX 319 0 køstunum .

#arbeiðsloyvi
SFX 320 N 11
SFX 320 0 loyva .
SFX 320 0 loyvanna .
SFX 320 0 loyvi .
SFX 320 0 loyvið .
SFX 320 0 loyvini .
SFX 320 0 loyvinum .
SFX 320 0 loyvir .
SFX 320 0 loyvis .
SFX 320 0 loyvisins .
SFX 320 0 loyvum .
SFX 320 0 loyvunum .

#bakkaskegg
SFX 321 N 10
SFX 321 g s .
SFX 321 g sins .
SFX 321 0 a .
SFX 321 0 anna .
SFX 321 0 i .
SFX 321 0 ið .
SFX 321 0 ini .
SFX 321 0 inum .
SFX 321 0 um .
SFX 321 0 unum .

#afturfyrisegkomin
SFX 322 N 8
SFX 322 0 komið .
SFX 322 0 komin .
SFX 322 0 komna .
SFX 322 0 komnan .
SFX 322 0 komnar .
SFX 322 0 komnari .
SFX 322 0 komnir .
SFX 322 0 komnum .

#ástarsamband
SFX 323 N 12
SFX 323 0 samband .
SFX 323 0 sambanda .
SFX 323 0 sambandanna .
SFX 323 0 sambandi .
SFX 323 0 sambandið .
SFX 323 0 sambandinum .
SFX 323 0 sambands .
SFX 323 0 sambandsins .
SFX 323 0 sambond .
SFX 323 0 sambondini .
SFX 323 0 sambondum .
SFX 323 0 sambondunum .

#agnsetur
SFX 324 N 11
SFX 324 0 setra .
SFX 324 0 setranna .
SFX 324 0 setri .
SFX 324 0 setrið .
SFX 324 0 setrini .
SFX 324 0 setrinum .
SFX 324 0 setrum .
SFX 324 0 setrunum .
SFX 324 0 setur .
SFX 324 0 seturs .
SFX 324 0 setursins .

#brotssparkakapping
SFX 325 N 11
SFX 325 0 kapping .
SFX 325 0 kappinga .
SFX 325 0 kappinganna .
SFX 325 0 kappingar .
SFX 325 0 kappingarinnar .
SFX 325 0 kappingarnar .
SFX 325 0 kappingin .
SFX 325 0 kappingina .
SFX 325 0 kappingini .
SFX 325 0 kappingum .
SFX 325 0 kappingunum .

#bakfjøl
SFX 326 N 15
SFX 326 0 fjala .
SFX 326 0 fjalanna .
SFX 326 0 fjalar .
SFX 326 0 fjalarinnar .
SFX 326 0 fjalarnar .
SFX 326 0 fjalir .
SFX 326 0 fjalirnar .
SFX 326 0 fjalum .
SFX 326 0 fjalunum .
SFX 326 0 fjøl .
SFX 326 0 fjølin .
SFX 326 0 fjølina .
SFX 326 0 fjølini .
SFX 326 0 fjølum .
SFX 326 0 fjølunum .

#átjangarnslína
SFX 327 N 11
SFX 327 0 lína .
SFX 327 0 línan .
SFX 327 0 línanna .
SFX 327 0 línu .
SFX 327 0 línum .
SFX 327 0 línuna .
SFX 327 0 línuni .
SFX 327 0 línunnar .
SFX 327 0 línunum .
SFX 327 0 línur .
SFX 327 0 línurnar .

#barnagarðslærari
SFX 328 N 12
SFX 328 0 lærara .
SFX 328 0 læraran .
SFX 328 0 læraranna .
SFX 328 0 lærarans .
SFX 328 0 læraranum .
SFX 328 0 lærarar .
SFX 328 0 lærararnar .
SFX 328 0 lærararnir .
SFX 328 0 lærari .
SFX 328 0 lærarin .
SFX 328 0 lærarum .
SFX 328 0 lærarunum .

#aldursformaður
SFX 329 N 15
SFX 329 0 formaður .
SFX 329 0 formaðurin .
SFX 329 0 formann .
SFX 329 0 formanna .
SFX 329 0 formannanna .
SFX 329 0 formanni .
SFX 329 0 formannin .
SFX 329 0 formanninum .
SFX 329 0 formans .
SFX 329 0 formansins .
SFX 329 0 formenn .
SFX 329 0 formenninar .
SFX 329 0 formenninir .
SFX 329 0 formonnum .
SFX 329 0 formonnunum .

#antaregg
SFX 330 N 13
SFX 330 0 egg .
SFX 330 0 eggi .
SFX 330 0 eggið .
SFX 330 0 eggini .
SFX 330 0 egginum .
SFX 330 0 eggja .
SFX 330 0 eggjanna .
SFX 330 0 eggjum .
SFX 330 0 eggjunum .
SFX 330 0 eggum .
SFX 330 0 eggunum .
SFX 330 0 egs .
SFX 330 0 egsins .

#áarbakki
SFX 331 N 14
SFX 331 0 bakka .
SFX 331 0 bakkan .
SFX 331 0 bakkanna .
SFX 331 0 bakkans .
SFX 331 0 bakkanum .
SFX 331 0 bakkar .
SFX 331 0 bakkarnar .
SFX 331 0 bakkarnir .
SFX 331 0 bakki .
SFX 331 0 bakkin .
SFX 331 0 bakkum .
SFX 331 0 bakkunum .
SFX 331 0 bøkkum .
SFX 331 0 bøkkunum .

#bestimaður
SFX 332 N 2
SFX 332 0 ur .
SFX 332 0 urin .

#arbeiðslýsi
SFX 333 N 5
SFX 333 0 lýsi .
SFX 333 0 lýsið .
SFX 333 0 lýsinum .
SFX 333 0 lýsis .
SFX 333 0 lýsisins .

#landspolitikkur
SFX 334 N 8
SFX 334 0 politikk .
SFX 334 0 politikki .
SFX 334 0 politikkin .
SFX 334 0 politikkinum .
SFX 334 0 politikkur .
SFX 334 0 politikkurin .
SFX 334 0 politiks .
SFX 334 0 politiksins .

#bíðilisti
SFX 335 N 12
SFX 335 0 lista .
SFX 335 0 listan .
SFX 335 0 listanna .
SFX 335 0 listans .
SFX 335 0 listanum .
SFX 335 0 listar .
SFX 335 0 listarnar .
SFX 335 0 listarnir .
SFX 335 0 listi .
SFX 335 0 listin .
SFX 335 0 listum .
SFX 335 0 listunum .

#angahoyggj
SFX 336 N 3
SFX 336 j i .
SFX 336 j ið .
SFX 336 j inum .

#akkersstokkur
SFX 337 N 15
SFX 337 0 stokk .
SFX 337 0 stokka .
SFX 337 0 stokkanna .
SFX 337 0 stokkar .
SFX 337 0 stokkarnar .
SFX 337 0 stokkarnir .
SFX 337 0 stokki .
SFX 337 0 stokkin .
SFX 337 0 stokkinum .
SFX 337 0 stokkum .
SFX 337 0 stokkunum .
SFX 337 0 stokkur .
SFX 337 0 stokkurin .
SFX 337 0 stoks .
SFX 337 0 stoksins .

#avdeyðakúgv
SFX 338 N 5
SFX 338 0 a .
SFX 338 0 anna .
SFX 338 0 ar .
SFX 338 0 arinnar .
SFX 338 0 in .

#atatorva
SFX 339 N 11
SFX 339 0 torva .
SFX 339 0 torvan .
SFX 339 0 torvanna .
SFX 339 0 torvu .
SFX 339 0 torvum .
SFX 339 0 torvuna .
SFX 339 0 torvuni .
SFX 339 0 torvunnar .
SFX 339 0 torvunum .
SFX 339 0 torvur .
SFX 339 0 torvurnar .

#borgmeistari
SFX 340 N 12
SFX 340 0 meistara .
SFX 340 0 meistaran .
SFX 340 0 meistaranna .
SFX 340 0 meistarans .
SFX 340 0 meistaranum .
SFX 340 0 meistarar .
SFX 340 0 meistararnar .
SFX 340 0 meistararnir .
SFX 340 0 meistari .
SFX 340 0 meistarin .
SFX 340 0 meistarum .
SFX 340 0 meistarunum .

#almannagøta
SFX 341 N 11
SFX 341 0 gøta .
SFX 341 0 gøtan .
SFX 341 0 gøtanna .
SFX 341 0 gøtu .
SFX 341 0 gøtum .
SFX 341 0 gøtuna .
SFX 341 0 gøtuni .
SFX 341 0 gøtunnar .
SFX 341 0 gøtunum .
SFX 341 0 gøtur .
SFX 341 0 gøturnar .

#alskhugaður
SFX 342 N 8
SFX 342 0 hugað .
SFX 342 0 hugaða .
SFX 342 0 hugaðan .
SFX 342 0 hugaðar .
SFX 342 0 hugaðari .
SFX 342 0 hugaðir .
SFX 342 0 hugaðum .
SFX 342 0 hugaður .

#atfangakvøld
SFX 343 N 11
SFX 343 0 kvøld .
SFX 343 0 kvølda .
SFX 343 0 kvøldanna .
SFX 343 0 kvøldi .
SFX 343 0 kvøldið .
SFX 343 0 kvøldini .
SFX 343 0 kvøldinum .
SFX 343 0 kvølds .
SFX 343 0 kvøldsins .
SFX 343 0 kvøldum .
SFX 343 0 kvøldunum .

#afturbót
SFX 344 N 12
SFX 344 0 bót .
SFX 344 0 bóta .
SFX 344 0 bótanna .
SFX 344 0 bótar .
SFX 344 0 bótarinnar .
SFX 344 0 bótin .
SFX 344 0 bótina .
SFX 344 0 bótini .
SFX 344 0 bótum .
SFX 344 0 bótunum .
SFX 344 0 bøtur .
SFX 344 0 bøturnar .

#fíggjarstøða
SFX 345 N 6
SFX 345 0 støða .
SFX 345 0 støðan .
SFX 345 0 støðu .
SFX 345 0 støðuna .
SFX 345 0 støðuni .
SFX 345 0 støðunnar .

#afturveggur
SFX 346 N 15
SFX 346 0 vegg .
SFX 346 0 veggi .
SFX 346 0 veggin .
SFX 346 0 vegginum .
SFX 346 0 veggir .
SFX 346 0 veggirnar .
SFX 346 0 veggirnir .
SFX 346 0 veggja .
SFX 346 0 veggjanna .
SFX 346 0 veggjar .
SFX 346 0 veggjarins .
SFX 346 0 veggjum .
SFX 346 0 veggjunum .
SFX 346 0 veggur .
SFX 346 0 veggurin .

#baktanki
SFX 347 N 10
SFX 347 0 a .
SFX 347 0 an .
SFX 347 0 anna .
SFX 347 0 ans .
SFX 347 0 anum .
SFX 347 0 ar .
SFX 347 0 arnar .
SFX 347 0 arnir .
SFX 347 0 i .
SFX 347 0 in .

#afturfit
SFX 348 N 11
SFX 348 j 0 .
SFX 348 j in .
SFX 348 j ina .
SFX 348 j ini .
SFX 348 0 a .
SFX 348 0 anna .
SFX 348 0 ar .
SFX 348 0 arinnar .
SFX 348 0 arnar .
SFX 348 0 um .
SFX 348 0 unum .

#argasjón
SFX 349 N 12
SFX 349 0 sjón .
SFX 349 0 sjóna .
SFX 349 0 sjónanna .
SFX 349 0 sjónar .
SFX 349 0 sjónarinnar .
SFX 349 0 sjónin .
SFX 349 0 sjónina .
SFX 349 0 sjónini .
SFX 349 0 sjónir .
SFX 349 0 sjónirnar .
SFX 349 0 sjónum .
SFX 349 0 sjónunum .

#formáli
SFX 350 N 12
SFX 350 0 mála .
SFX 350 0 málan .
SFX 350 0 málanna .
SFX 350 0 málans .
SFX 350 0 málanum .
SFX 350 0 málar .
SFX 350 0 málarnar .
SFX 350 0 málarnir .
SFX 350 0 máli .
SFX 350 0 málin .
SFX 350 0 málum .
SFX 350 0 málunum .

#barsilsgáva
SFX 351 N 11
SFX 351 0 gáva .
SFX 351 0 gávan .
SFX 351 0 gávanna .
SFX 351 0 gávu .
SFX 351 0 gávum .
SFX 351 0 gávuna .
SFX 351 0 gávuni .
SFX 351 0 gávunnar .
SFX 351 0 gávunum .
SFX 351 0 gávur .
SFX 351 0 gávurnar .
