third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.dic
bil/10,50,364,152,142,7,137,369,324
bólkabardag/1,347
bori/1,144,352,95,111,320
brotssparka/1,325
brúðar/1,296,351,365,259,50,180,86,20,387
deildar/1,329,270,300,106,161,152
deyð/6,205,284,456,322,131,216,289,412,71
døglings/1,266,333,379
eld/6,451,62,215,105,206,245,144,342,50,64,23,319,36,79,49,159,295,216,173,103,7,21,446,125,90
erki/1,305,324
evna/1,139,354,204,141,36,12,207,79,226,323,225,383
ferðafólka/1,335,95
fiskivinnusátt/1,350
fjall/1,282,434,38,51,105,81,431,341,425,268,264,180,343,153,333,201,20,178,49,131,72,311,312,70,382,100,346
fjós/8,48,51,180,86,287,346,271
fláar/1,339
flagg/492,38,23,327,95,362
fliðuskelj/1,348
fólkaskúla/1,328,154,249
fýr/16,173,586,7,27,340
gjøldkúgv/338
glappa/1,319
gólv/10,174,326,335,45,381,339
grá/1,113,429,181,4,264,58,433,12,148,333,263,368,85,272,90
gras/483,170,331,291,306,128,252,81,141,23,172,79,49,394,223,189,157,339,104,101
grinda/1,170,93,113,156,282,253,291,123,92,329,279,198,319,361,36,335,79,154,333,20,45,230,308,385,225,337,222,447,249,309
gró/1,77,384,248,65,318,36,366
halgi/1,124,38,468,75,169,343,229,114,146
hamarspjall/1,4,347
handils/1,62,174,96,168,285,123,139,365,50,318,310,12,320,404,20,178,323,60,95,150,173,152,337,370,211,297,160,459,51,341,228,334,373,375,314,72,239
havhesta/1,330,317,70,242
heim/10,285,296,322,31,185,36,12,358,79,320,293,173,7
heimsmeistara/1,325
høgg/321,344,23,114,447
holu/1,103,346,408,394
høvuðbrýggj/336
huga/1,284,353,238,123,141,31,12,295,439,323,298
hús/48,6,111,274,306,128,51,143,425,169,218,250,4,112,86,31,36,12,358,328,20,167,287,165,414,346
hveiti/1,452,318,391
hvørv/18,13,68,25,16,11,349
illimað/1,332
illmoldar/1,339
ímyndingar/1,351
ískoytissátt/1,350
kald/1,46,342,12,364,293
klógv/338
klyvj/1,348
kol/13,3,6,111,62,266,276,144,360,340,391,287,272,22
kvøld/10,6,77,333,20,45,209,150,298
kyllingahoyggj/336
lærdóms/1,20,324,222
laksa/1,327,93,309,20,373,375,95,160
landhøgg/321
landkomu/1,38,343
landsstýris/1,107,20,197,51,329,86,257
leysa/1,331,77,83,245,319,86,358,229,328,199,146,125
loft/10,133,11,217,335,219,195,114,176,95,412,85,89,190
lomvigar/1,330,266,224
lop/1,331,326
lykil/1,102,345,146
manna/1,151,113,285,266,197,294,107,259,83,341,268,318,408,358,45,372,413,295,386,251,182,238
mannamuð/1,332
mylnu/1,77,184,85,337
ný/170,205,124,285,75,69,322,428,185,172,295,72,70,175,265
nýskipanar/1,237,342,334,439
øðudregg/321
orða/1,96,353,423,238,197,206,31,261,335,207,235,410,404,49,372,226,323,260,225,364,165,385
ovur/1,342,319,270,20,49,226,72,312,104,100
pissi/1,344,164
prest/93,285,123,51,425,169,50,264,86,310,79,20,324,371,7
rá/227,227,546,174,69,306,128,133,418,181,26,58,12,333,60,175,211,459
ráðharra/1,161,89,107,335,222
renova/1,349
riklings/1,319
róðurs/1,327,20,20
rogn/10,92,318
rossahoyggj/336
ser/274,126,197,354,204,304,214,309,112,117,12,320,402,328,45,137,228,417,150,345,14,257,72,89
setanarsátt/1,350
setursráðs/1,329,107,257
sigur/39,218,318,85
skarnsmuð/1,332
skarvs/1,330,294,195,242
skipsfelag/1,347
skitsúgv/338
skriðu/1,331,430,245,195,85
skurð/1,170,174,126,326,75,153,12,402,114,131,89,166,70,231,90
snar/3,3,6,93,282,254,434,123,107,105,553,325,117,433,12,219,333,14,182
stakkalahoyggj/336
still/631,6,304,105,25,15,23,263,345,357
stokka/1,344,214,144,50,343,89,190,103,211
stórirygg/1,332
strandhøgg/321
svørðseggj/1,348
tele/1,359,323
tilboðs/1,335
timbur/1,111,374,50,404,20,340,337,370,126
trappu/1,341,169,85,313
trettanda/1,285,38,343,387
tumma/1,174,326,401,337,211
turr/6,330,133,215,92,433,172,12,132,469,104,100
umgangs/1,328,150
undan/1,353,456,171,265,378,442,325,322,20,417,379,313,165,97
úrtøku/1,304,141,325,207,49
útskeinkingar/1,320
vákna/1,327,362
vambar/1,156,319
van/1,291,105,4,12,349,345,84,297,80
varabýráðs/1,329
veitar/1,331,448,105,4,125
veitslu/1,351,169,278,12,20,132,38,178
verju/1,81,36,192,79,20,161,95,184,160,126,300,261,106,334,72
virkis/1,81,279,50,202,36,12,79,173,346,237,249,270,300
yvir/1,111,262,174,205,254,284,126,353,296,51,259,425,342,50,224,319,180,408,172,269,440,410,402,328,20,230,161,314,417,349,72,288,85,453,188,165,70,339,190,97,104
